District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.13

Employment and expenditures authorized.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 799, ch. 736, § 14
Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 809, ch. 744, § 9(b)
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, ch. 782, title XI, § 1106(a)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(yy), 25 DCR 5740
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-813.
1973 Ed., § 5-713.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).